Utah statutes.
78B-12-215.   Child care costs.
(1)  The need to include child care costs in the child support order is
presumed, if the custodial parent or the noncustodial parent, during extended
parent-time, is working and actually incurring the child care costs.
(2)  The need to include child care costs is not presumed, but may be awarded
on a case-by-case basis, if the costs are related to the career or
occupational training of the custodial parent, or if otherwise ordered by the
court in the interest of justice.
